Massachusetts, session 194th, H5275.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1. Section 12 of Chapter 123 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (a) the following subsection:- 
(a½) No person shall be restrained under subsection (a) at a facility not authorized by the 
department to perform evaluations under subsection (b) unless the person, or the person’s parent 
or legal guardian on the person’s behalf, is given an opportunity to apply for voluntary admission 
under paragraph (a) of section 10 and unless the person, or the person’s parent or legal guardian, 
has been informed that: (i) the person has a right to such voluntary admission; and (ii) the period 
of restraint under this section cannot exceed 72 hours. Any person restrained longer than 72 
hours must be released or transferred to a facility authorized by the department to perform 
evaluations under said subsection (b); provided, however, that, at any time during such period of 
hospitalization, the superintendent may discharge such person if the superintendent determines 
that such person is not in need of care and treatment; and provided further, that any person 
restrained under this section at a facility that has not been authorized by the department to 
perform evaluations under subsection (b) for more than 48 hours shall be informed by the facility 

of 2 15 that it shall, upon such person’s request, notify the committee for public counsel services of the 
name and location of the person restrained. The committee for public counsel services shall 
immediately appoint an attorney who shall meet with the person. If the appointed attorney 
determines that the person voluntarily and knowingly waives the right to be represented, is 
presently represented or will be represented by another attorney, the appointed attorney shall so 
notify the committee for public counsel services, which shall withdraw the appointment. Any 
person restrained under this subsection who has reason to believe that such restraint is the result 
of an abuse or misuse of this subsection may request or request through counsel an emergency 
hearing in the district court in whose jurisdiction the facility is located and, unless a delay is 
requested by the person or through counsel, the district court shall hold such hearing on the day 
the request is filed with the court or not later than the next business day.